Wyoming statutes. Title 2 Wills, Decedents' Estates and Probate Code
Article 1. In General

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Ungrateful Living: An Estate Planner's Nightmare — The Trial Attorney's Dream,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 401 (1989).

For case note, “STATUTES — Retroactive Application of the 1980 Wyoming Probate Code. Douglas v. Newell, 719 P.2d 971,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 555

(Wyo. 1986),” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 553 (1989).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Effect of testamentary gift to child conditioned upon specified arrangements for parental control, 11 ALR4th 940.

Testamentary option to purchase estate property at surviving optionee's death, 18 ALR4th 578.

§ 2-6-101.
Right to make and dispose; exception.

Any person of legal age and sound mind may make a will and dispose of all of his property by will except what is sufficient to pay his debts, and subject to the rights of the surviving spouse and children.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Modern status: validity and effect of mortmain statutes, 6 ALR4th 603.

Alzheimer's disease as affecting testamentary capacity, 47 ALR5th 523.

§ 2-6-102.
All property deemed passed; “property” defined.

A will is construed to pass all property which the testator owns at his death including property acquired after the execution of the will, unless a contrary intention is indicated by the will. “Property”, as used in this section, includes both real and personal property, or any interest therein, and means anything that may be the subject of ownership.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What passes under terms “furniture” or “furnishings” in will, 21 ALR4th 383.

Wills: what constitutes “bank,” “checking,” or “savings” account, within meaning of bequest, 31 ALR4th 688.

Proper disposition under will providing for allocation of express percentages or proportions amounting to more or less than whole or residuary estate, 35 ALR4th 788.

What passes under term “personal property” in will, 31 ALR5th 499.

§ 2-6-103.
Property passed may be governed by trust instrument.

By a will signed and attested as provided in this article a testator may devise and bequeath real and personal estate to a trustee of a trust which is evidenced by a written instrument in existence when the will is made and which is identified in the will, even though the trust is subject to amendment, modification, revocation or termination. Unless the will provides otherwise the estate so devised and bequeathed is governed by the terms and provisions of the instrument creating the trust including any amendments or modifications in writing made before or after the making of the will and before the death of the testator.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 180, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 2-53; W.S. 1977, §

2-4-107

; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cited

in

Kerper v. Kerper, 780 P.2d 923,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 253

(Wyo. 1989).

Law reviews. —

See note, “Incorporating Nontestamentary Documents Into a Will,” 15 Wyo. L.J. 58 (1960).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Reservation of benefit to settlor for life, with power of revocation, as affecting validity of trust created by instrument not executed as a will, 32 ALR2d 1270.

“Pour-over” provisions from will to inter vivos trust, 12 ALR3d 56.

Validity of voting trust created by will, 77 ALR4th 1194.

§ 2-6-104.
Law governing meaning and effect.

The meaning and legal effect of a disposition in a will is determined by the law of the state in which the will was executed, unless the will otherwise provides or unless the application of that law is contrary to the public policy of this state otherwise applicable to the disposition.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Codicil executed in another state. —

When determining the validity of a codicil executed in another state by a Wyoming resident, Wyoming courts will apply the law of Wyoming unless the execution did not conform to the requirements of this title; only then will Wyoming courts be justified in turning to the law of the place where the codicil was executed. In re Estate of Zelikovitz, 923 P.2d 740,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 1996).

South Dakota statutes, similar to Wyoming's, applied. —

Where will was executed in South Dakota and South Dakota statutes concerning bequests to subscribing witnesses bore strong similarity to Wyoming provisions, the application of the South Dakota statutes did not violate the public policy of the state of In re Estate of Campbell, 673 P.2d 645,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 398

(Wyo. 1983).

Quoted

in

Douglas v. Newell, 719 P.2d 971,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 555

(Wyo. 1986); In re Estate of Reed, 768 P.2d 566,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1989).

§ 2-6-105.
Rules of construction and intention.

The intention of a testator as expressed in his will controls the legal effect of his dispositions. The rules of construction expressed in the succeeding sections of this article apply unless a contrary intention is indicated by the will.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Intent must govern. —

In considering a will, the intent of the testator must govern, and the court can only determine testator's intent from what the will says. Dainton v. Watson, 658 P.2d 79,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 283

(Wyo. 1983).

Intent immaterial where no valid will. —

A court cannot consider the testator's intent in order to justify the probate of a recorded statement, which is not a valid will; intent is immaterial where there is no valid will. In re Estate of Reed, 672 P.2d 829,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 389

(Wyo. 1983).

Will unambiguous. —

In a challenge to a will, the court held that the language of the will was apparent and unambiguously reflected the testatrix's intent that the stock held solely in her name, located in the safety deposit box, be distributed to the sister, and did not reflect an intention that the stocks were to pass under the residuary clause. Baker v. Enis (In re Estate of Stanton), 2005 WY 74, 114 P.3d 1246,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 2005).

Codicil not void where mistakenly refers to wrong date. —

A codicil was not void even though it referred to a will dated April 16, 1982, which will was not presented for probate. The probate court properly found that the April 16, 1982 date was a mistake on the part of the draftsman of the will and not that of the testator, a mistake which would have made a distribution other than in accordance with the expressed distributive intention of the testator as determined from the codicil itself. In re Estate of Croft, 713 P.2d 782,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 478

(Wyo. 1986).

Quoted

in

Douglas v. Newell, 719 P.2d 971,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 555

(Wyo. 1986).

Cited

in

Sanderson v. Bathrick (In re Estate of Seader), 2003 WY 119, 76 P.3d 1236,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 2003)

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Probate — In re Estate of Reed, 672 P.2d 829,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 389

, 42 A.L.R.4th 167 (Wyo. 1983),” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 279 (1985).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Wills: gift to persons individually named but also described in terms of relationship to testator or another as class gift, 13 ALR4th 978.

What passes under terms “furniture” or “furnishings” in will, 21 ALR4th 383.

Proper disposition under will providing for allocation of express percentages or proportions amounting to more or less than whole or residuary estate, 35 ALR4th 788.

Effect of impossibility of performance of condition precedent to testamentary gift, 40 ALR4th 193.

Testamentary direction to devisee to pay stated sum of money to third party as creating charge or condition or as imposing personal liability on devisee for nonpayment, 54 ALR4th 1098.

Wills: effect of gift of specified percentage or share of estate (or residuary estate) to include specific property found to be of a greater value than share bequeathed, 63 ALR4th 1186.

Adoption as precluding testamentary gift under natural relative's will, 71 ALR4th 374.

What constitutes contest or attempt to defeat will within provision thereof forfeiting share of contesting beneficiary, 3 ALR5th 590.

Action for tortious interference with bequest as precluded by will contest remedy, 18 ALR5th 211.

Construction and application of “pay-all-taxes” provision in will, as including liability of nontestamentary property for inheritance and estate taxes, 56 ALR5th 133.

§ 2-6-106.
Antilapse; deceased devisees; class gifts.

If a devisee who is a grandparent or a lineal descendent of a grandparent of the testator is dead at the time of execution of the will, fails to survive the testator, or is treated as if he predeceased the testator, the issue of the deceased devisee take in place of the deceased devisee and if they are all of the same degree of kinship to the devisee they take equally, but if of unequal degree then those of more remote degree take per stirpes. One who would have been a devisee under a class gift if he had survived the testator is treated as a devisee for purposes of this section whether his death occurred before or after the execution of the will.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Construction with adoption statutes. —

Legislative intent is certainly clear that if a child is adopted, the child will then be a lineal descendent under the statutes, but Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

2-6-106

, the anti-lapse statute, just as clearly makes no provision for step-children or other persons who are not “legally adopted''; a lineal descendent is a lineal descendent, and in that regard, the words of the statute are not ambiguous, and the Wyoming Supreme Court cannot create an ambiguity within the statute by asking whether it should apply an equitable doctrine to broaden the class of persons identified by the statute. Sanderson v. Bathrick (In re Estate of Seader), 2003 WY 119, 76 P.3d 1236,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 2003).

Application. —

Based on the clear and unambiguous language of the last will and testament, there was no indication that it was the decedent's intention to have decedent's stepchild's children inherit the share the stepchild would have inherited had the stepchild survived the decedent, where the decedent never officially adopted the stepchild, and the Wyoming Supreme Court declined to apply the doctrine of equitable adoption to affect the distribution of a testate estate and to avoid the operation of the anti-lapse statute, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

2-6-106

.Sanderson v. Bathrick (In re Estate of Seader), 2003 WY 119, 76 P.3d 1236,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 2003).

Applied

in

In re Estate of Ronald, 2014 WY 129, 2014 Wyo. LEXIS
146 (Oct. 14, 2014).

§ 2-6-107.
Failure of a testamentary provision.

Except as provided in W.S.

2-6-106

, if a devise other than a residuary devise fails for any reason, it becomes a part of the residue.

Except as provided in W.S.

2-6-106

, if the residue is devised to two (2) or more persons and the share of one (1) of the residuary devisees fails for any reason, his share passes to the residuary devisee, or to other residuary devisees in proportion to their interests in the residue.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Construction. —

Legislative intent is certainly clear that if a child is adopted, the child will then be a lineal descendent under the statutes, but Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

2-6-106

, the anti-lapse statute, just as clearly makes no provision for step-children or other persons who are not “legally adopted”; a lineal descendent is a lineal descendent, and in that regard, the words of the statute are not ambiguous, and the Wyoming Supreme Court cannot create an ambiguity within the statute by asking whether it should apply an equitable doctrine to broaden the class of persons identified by the statute. Sanderson v. Bathrick (In re Estate of Seader), 2003 WY 119, 76 P.3d 1236,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 2003).

Application. —

Although the decedent often voiced decedent's intention to adopt a stepchild, a formal adoption was never carried out, and where the stepchild predeceased the decedent, the Wyoming Supreme Court declined to apply doctrine of equitable adoption, to avoid operation of the anti-lapse statute. Sanderson v. Bathrick (In re Estate of Seader), 2003 WY 119, 76 P.3d 1236,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 2003).

§ 2-6-108.
Specific devise of securities; accessions; nonademption.

If the testator intended a specific devise of certain securities rather than the equivalent value thereof, the specific devisee is entitled only to:

As much of the devised securities as are a part of the estate at time of the testator’s death;

Any additional or other securities of the same entity owned by the testator by reason of action initiated by the entity excluding any acquired by exercise of purchase options;

Securities of another entity owned by the testator as a result of a merger, consolidation, reorganization or other similar action initiated by the entity; and

Any additional securities of the entity owned by the testator as a result of a plan of reinvestment.

Distributions prior to death with respect to a specifically devised security not provided for in subsection (a) of this section are not part of the specific devise.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Ademption or revocation of specific devise or bequest by guardian, committee, conservator or trustee of mentally or physically incompetent testator, 84 ALR4th 462.

§ 2-6-109.
Nonademption of specific devises where sold by conservator; exception; rights of specific devisee.

If specifically devised property is sold by a conservator, or if a condemnation award or insurance proceeds are paid to a conservator as a result of a condemnation, fire or casualty, the specific devisee has the right to a general pecuniary devise equal to the net sale price, the condemnation award or the insurance proceeds. This subsection does not apply if after the sale, condemnation or casualty, it is adjudicated that the disability of the testator has ceased and the testator survives the adjudication by one (1) year. The right of the specific devisee under this subsection is reduced by any right he has under subsection (b) of this section.

A specific devisee has the right to the remaining specifically devised property and:

Any balance of the purchase price together with any security interest owing from a purchaser to the testator at death by reason of sale of the property;

Any amount of a condemnation award for the taking of the property unpaid at death;

Any proceeds unpaid at death on a fire or casualty insurance on the property; and

Property owned by testator at his death as a result of foreclosure, or obtained in lieu of foreclosure, of the security for a specifically devised obligation.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a), substituted “subsection (b) of this section” for “subsection (a).”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Contract balance under sales contract part of testatrix's “interest”in land. —

The contract balance remaining for ranch land sold under a 1980 installment sales contract was to be distributed in accord with a 1969 will provision under which the testatrix gave, devised and bequeathed “all of my interest and title” in the land. Douglas v. Newell, 719 P.2d 971,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 555

(Wyo. 1986).

Quoted

in

In re Estate of Newell, 765 P.2d 1353,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 174

(Wyo. 1988).

§ 2-6-110.
Exercise of power of appointment.

A general residuary clause in a will, or a will making general disposition of all of the testator’s property, does not exercise a power of appointment held by the testator unless specific reference is made to the power or there is some other indication of intention to include the property subject to the power.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Sufficiency of exercise of power specifying that it can be exercised only by specific or direct reference thereto, 15 ALR4th 810.

Validity of testamentary exercise of power of appointment by donee sane when will was executed but insane thereafter, 19 ALR4th 1002.

§ 2-6-111.
Nonexoneration.

A specific devise passes subject to any mortgage, security, interest or lien existing at the date of death, without right of exoneration, regardless of a general directive in the will to pay debts.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-6-112.
Will to be in writing; number and competency of witnesses; signature of testator; subscribing witness not to benefit; exception.

Except as provided in the next section [§

2-6-113

], all wills to be valid shall be in writing, or typewritten, witnessed by two (2) competent witnesses and signed by the testator or by some person in his presence and by his express direction. If the witnesses are competent at the time of attesting the execution of the will, their subsequent incompetency shall not prevent the probate and allowance of the will. No subscribing witness to any will can derive any benefit therefrom unless there are two (2) disinterested and competent witnesses to the same, but if without a will the witness would be entitled to any portion of the testator’s estate, the witness may still receive the portion to the extent and value of the amount devised.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 107, § 4; R.S. 1887, § 2237; Laws 1895, ch. 20, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 4568; C.S. 1910, § 5397; C.S. 1920, § 6670; R.S. 1931, § 88-104; C.S. 1945, § 6-304; W.S. 1957, § 2-50; W.S. 1977, §

2-4-104

; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to inapplicability of section to holographic wills, see §

2-6-113

.

Editor's notes. —

Section 2, ch. 20, Laws 1895, reads: “Any typewritten wills which may have been executed prior to the passage of this act shall be admitted to probate, notwithstanding the fact that they are typewritten, if in all other respects they are legally executed.” Prior to amendment by § 1, ch. 20, Laws 1895, this section merely provided that all wills must be in writing.

Right to make will controlled by legislature. —

The right to make a will did not exist at common law; thus, as a statutory right, it is subject to control by the legislature. In re Estate of Reed, 672 P.2d 829,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 389

(Wyo. 1983).

Nuncupative (oral) wills are not valid.

In re Estate of Boyd, 366 P.2d 336,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo. 1961).

All wills must be in writing, or typewritten, witnessed and signed,

to be valid. Merrill v. State (In re Estate of Thornton), 21 Wyo. 421, 133 P. 134,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1913).

They may be imprinted on typewriter with carbon paper. —

An instrument imprinted on a typewriter by the use of carbon paper and improperly called a “carbon copy,” bearing the signature of the testator and two subscribing witnesses, must be admitted to probate. Estate of Stringer, 80 Wyo. 389, 343 P.2d 508,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo.), modified, In re Estate of Stringer, 80 Wyo. 426, 345 P.2d 786,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Wyo. 1959).

Tape recorded statement cannot be admitted to probate

as a will. In re Estate of Reed, 672 P.2d 829,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 389

(Wyo. 1983).

Section precludes consideration of intent not expressed in will. —

This section requiring wills to be in writing precludes ascribing to the testator any intention which he did not express in the instrument itself. In re Estate of Boyd, 366 P.2d 336,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo. 1961); Churchfield v. First Nat'l Bank, 418 P.2d 1001,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 168

(Wyo. 1966); Percival v. Percival, 526 P.2d 342,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 230

(Wyo. 1974).

Instrument must show intention of testator to give, devise or leave property.

In re Estate of Boyd, 366 P.2d 336,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo. 1961).

And failure to describe recipient or property fatal. —

A valid disposition of property requires a definite subject and object, and if either is uncertain the defect is fatal. In re Estate of Boyd, 366 P.2d 336,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo. 1961).

A writing on hospital form wholly devoid of any description of the subject matter intended to be bequeathed, except for the nominal figure of $1.00, was properly denied probate. In re Estate of Boyd, 366 P.2d 336,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo. 1961).

Intent of testator must be ascertained alone from meaning of words used

by him in the purported will. Churchfield v. First Nat'l Bank, 418 P.2d 1001,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 168

(Wyo. 1966).

The intention of a testator is to be ascertained, if at all possible, from the meaning of all words used in the context of the entire will. Percival v. Percival, 526 P.2d 342,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 230

(Wyo. 1974).

It may not be read into will. —

To ascertain the testator's intention, a court may not read into the will something which the deceased did not write therein; it can glean only decedent's purpose from what his testament says. Churchfield v. First Nat'l Bank, 418 P.2d 1001,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 168

(Wyo. 1966); Percival v. Percival, 526 P.2d 342,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 230

(Wyo. 1974).

Courts have no authority to add provisions

to a will which the testator did not incorporate. Percival v. Percival, 526 P.2d 342,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 230

(Wyo. 1974).

And may not assume testator would have given intention to unknown facts. —

If testator has omitted to provide for the state of affairs which actually has come to pass, a court cannot make the assumption that testator would probably have had a given intention if he had thought of the state of facts which actually existed and give effect to such probable intention. Churchfield v. First Nat'l Bank, 418 P.2d 1001,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 168

(Wyo. 1966).

Based on the clear and unambiguous language of the last will and testament, there was no indication that it was the decedent’s intention to have decedent’'s stepchild’s children inherit the share the stepchild would have inherited had the stepchild survived the decedent, where the decedent never officially adopted the stepchild, and the Wyoming Supreme Court declined to apply the doctrine of equitable adoption to affect the distribution of a testate estate and to avoid the operation of the anti-lapse statute, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

2-6-106

.Sanderson v. Bathrick (In re Estate of Seader), 2003 WY 119, 76 P.3d 1236,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 2003).

Will signed by testator and witnessed suffices. —

A will which is signed by the testator and witnessed by two witnesses at his request is sufficient. In re Estate of Carey, 504 P.2d 793,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 291

(Wyo. 1972).

Witnesses need not know instrument they are signing and attesting is a will.

In re Estate of Carey, 504 P.2d 793,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 291

(Wyo. 1972).

Publication not required. —

This section does not require publication in express terms, and publication is not necessary. In re Estate of Carey, 504 P.2d 793,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 291

(Wyo. 1972).

Attorney as witness. —

Fact that attorney who drew will and was one of subscribing witnesses was also attorney for person named as executor and trustee, and later appeared as attorney for executor, trustee and contestee in probate proceedings, did not disqualify him and preclude his testifying in support of probate of the will. Lane's Estate, 50 Wyo. 119, 58 P.2d 415,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1936).

Notary as witness. —

A notary public who signs a will in his or her capacity as a notary may also serve as a witness to the execution of the will. In re Estate of Zelikovitz, 923 P.2d 740,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 1996).

Applied

in

In re Estate of Altman, 650 P.2d 277,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 377

(Wyo. 1982).

Quoted

in

In re Estate of Campbell, 673 P.2d 645,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 398

(Wyo. 1983); In re Estate of Croft, 713 P.2d 782,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 478

(Wyo. 1986).

Cited

in

Seeley v. Estate of Seeley, 627 P.2d 1357,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 335

(Wyo. 1981); Russell v. Sullivan, 2012 WY 20, 270 P.3d 677,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Feb. 14, 2012).

Law reviews. —

See “Implied Revocation of Wills in Wyoming,” 10 Wyo. L.J. 112.

For case note, “Probate — The Enforcement of Unwritten Wills, In re Estate of Reed, 672 P.2d 829,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 389

, 42 A.L.R.4th 167 (Wyo. 1983),” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 279 (1985).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Codicil as validating will or codicil which was invalid or inoperative at time of its purported execution, Hurley v. Blankinship, 313 Ky. 49, 229 S.W.2d 963, 1950 Ky. LEXIS 773 (Ky. 1950).

Witness to nuncupative will as entitled to take as beneficiary thereunder, 28 ALR2d 796.

Validity of will written on disconnected sheets, 38 ALR2d 477.

Letter as a will or codicil, 40 ALR2d 698.

“Attestation” or “witnessing” of will, required by statute, as including witnesses' subscription, 45 ALR2d 1365.

Failure of attesting witness to write or state place of residence as affecting will, 55 ALR2d 1053.

Sufficiency of publication of will, 60 ALR2d 124.

Affixing signatures of attesting witnesses before testator signs, 91 ALR2d 737.

Validity of a will signed by testator with the assistance of another, 98 ALR2d 824.

Mark, stamp, or symbol, or partial or abbreviated signature, validity of wills signed by, 98 ALR2d 841.

Sufficiency of testator's acknowledgment of signature from his conduct and the surrounding circumstances, 7 ALR3d 317.

Place of signature of attesting witnesses, 17 ALR3d 705.

Competency, as witness attesting will, of attorney named therein as executor's attorney, 30 ALR3d 1361.

Testator's illiteracy or lack of knowledge of language in which will is written as affecting its validity, 37 ALR3d 889.

When is will signed at “end” or “foot” as required by statute, 44 ALR3d 701.

Necessity that attesting witness realize instrument was intended as will, 71 ALR3d 877.

Fingerprints as signature, 71 ALR3d 1072.

Electronic tape recording as will, 42 ALR4th 176.

Payable-on-death savings account or certificate of deposit as will, 50 ALR4th 272.

§ 2-6-113.
Holographic will.

A will which does not comply with W.S.

2-6-112

is valid as an holographic will, whether or not witnessed, if it is entirely in the handwriting of the testator and signed by the hand of the testator himself.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 20, § 3; C.S. 1920, § 6670; R.S. 1931, § 88-104; C.S. 1945, § 6-305; W.S. 1957, § 2-54; W.S. 1977, §

2-4-108

; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Holographic will, containing third person's handwriting, madewith decedent's consent, denied probate admission. —

The court was correct in denying admission of a holographic will into probate, since it was not entirely in the handwriting of the decedent, but contained several notations in the handwriting of a third person, a trust officer, made with the knowledge and consent of the decedent. Whether the notations changed the disposition scheme of the will in a material way would have required construction of the will, which the court did not undertake. In re Estate of Dobson, 708 P.2d 422,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 595

(Wyo. 1985).

Cited

in

Seeley v. Estate of Seeley, 627 P.2d 1357,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 335

(Wyo. 1981); In re Estate of Zelikovitz, 923 P.2d 740,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 1996).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Probate — The Enforcement of Unwritten Wills, In re Estate of Reed, 672 P.2d 829,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 389

, 42 A.L.R.4th 167 (Wyo. 1983),” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 279 (1985).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Requirement that holographic will, or its material provisions, be entirely in testator's handwriting as affected by appearance of some printed or written matter not in testator's handwriting, 37 ALR4th 528.

§ 2-6-114.
Self-proving wills.

Any will may be simultaneously executed, attested and made self-proven, by the acknowledgment thereof by the testator and the affidavits of the witnesses, each made before an officer authorized to administer oaths under the laws of the state where execution occurs and evidenced by the officer’s certificate under official seal, in form and content substantially as follows:

I, , the testator, sign my name to this instrument this day of , (year), and being first duly sworn, do hereby declare to the undersigned authority that I sign and execute this instrument as my last will and that I sign it willingly (or willingly direct another to sign for me), that I execute it as my free and voluntary act for the purposes therein expressed, and that I am an adult person, of sound mind, and under no constraint or undue influence. Testator We, , the witnesses, sign our names to this instrument, being first duly sworn, and do hereby declare to the undersigned authority that the testator signs and executes this instrument as his last will and that he signs it willingly (or willingly directs another to sign for him), and that he executes it as his free and voluntary act for the purposes therein expressed, and that each of us, in the presence and hearing of the testator, hereby signs this will as witnesses to the testator's signature and that to the best of our knowledge the testator is an adult person, of sound mind, and under no constraint or undue influence. Witness Witness STATE OF WYOMING COUNTY OF ss Subscribed, sworn to and acknowledged before me by , the testator, and subscribed and sworn to before me by and , witnesses, this day of
(SEAL) (Signed)
(Official Capacity of Officer)

Click to view

The execution of the acknowledgment by the testator and the affidavits of the witnesses as provided for in this section shall be sufficient to satisfy the requirements of the signing of the will by the testator and the witnesses under W.S.

2-6-112

.

An attested will may at the time of its execution or at any subsequent date be made self-proven by the acknowledgment thereof by the testator and the affidavits of the witnesses, each made before an officer authorized to administer oaths under the laws of this state or under the laws of the state where execution occurs, and evidenced by the officer’s certificate under official seal, attached or annexed to the will in form and contents substantially as follows:

STATE OF WYOMING COUNTY OF ss We, , , and, the testator and the witnesses, respectively, whose names are signed to the attached or foregoing instrument, being first duly sworn, do hereby declare to the undersigned authority that the testator signed and executed the instrument as his last will and that he signed willingly or willingly directed another to sign for him, and that he executed it as his free and voluntary act for the purposes therein expressed; and that each of the witnesses, in the presence and hearing of the testator, signed the will as witness and that to the best of our knowledge the testator was at that time an adult person, of sound mind and under no constraint or undue influence. Testator Witness Witness Subscribed, sworn to and acknowledged before me by , the testator, and subscribed and sworn to before me by and , witnesses, this day of ,
(SEAL) (Signed)
(Official Capacity of Officer)

Click to view

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1; 1999, ch. 150, § 2.

Cited

in

In re Estate of Zelikovitz, 923 P.2d 740,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 1996).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Proper execution of self-proving affidavit as validating or otherwise curing defect in execution of will itself, 1 ALR5th 965.

§ 2-6-115.
Who may witness.

Any person generally competent to be a witness may act as a witness to a will.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-6-116.
Validity of execution.

A written will is valid if executed in compliance with W.S.

2-6-112

or

2-6-113

or if its execution complies with the law at the time of execution of the place where the will is executed, or of the law of the place where at the time of execution or at the time of death the testator is domiciled, has a place of abode or is a national.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Codicil executed in another state. —

When determining the validity of a codicil executed in another state by a Wyoming resident, Wyoming courts will apply the law of Wyoming unless the execution did not conform to the requirements of this title; only then will Wyoming courts be justified in turning to the law of the place where the codicil was executed. In re Estate of Zelikovitz, 923 P.2d 740,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 1996).

Cited

in

Seeley v. Estate of Seeley, 627 P.2d 1357,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 335

(Wyo. 1981).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Proper execution of self-proving affidavit as validating or otherwise curing defect in execution of will itself, 1 ALR5th 965.

§ 2-6-117.
Revocation by writing or by act.

A will or any part thereof is revoked:

By a subsequent will which revokes the prior will or part expressly or by inconsistence; or

By being burned, torn, cancelled, obliterated or destroyed with the intent and for the purpose of revoking it by the testator or by another person in his presence and by his direction.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Partial revocation

occurs if a part of the will is cancelled by the testator in an authorized fashion; provided that the remainder, standing alone, is an understandable testamentary expression and the alteration does not result in a new dispositive scheme. Seeley v. Estate of Seeley, 627 P.2d 1357,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 335

(Wyo. 1981).

Holographic wills may be partially revoked

by the testator as long as the remainder expresses an intelligible testamentary expression, and the revocation does not create a new scheme of disposition. Seeley v. Estate of Seeley, 627 P.2d 1357,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 335

(Wyo. 1981).

Where two parties agreed to make mutual wills,

each promising to dispose of his property to the other or, if the other be dead, to certain third persons, and one of the parties performs by leaving his property to the other, the intended devisees and legatees are entitled to enforce their rights as beneficiaries under the agreement. The contracting party who survives becomes estopped from making any other or different disposition of the property, and his obligations under the agreement become absolutely irrevocable and enforceable against him, at least where he avails himself of the provisions of the decedent's will in his favor and accepts substantial benefits thereunder. Kerper v. Kerper, 780 P.2d 923,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 253

(Wyo. 1989).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Establishment and effect, after death of one of the makers of joint, mutual, or reciprocal will, of agreement not to revoke will, 17 ALR4th 167.

Revocation of prior will by revocation clause in lost will or other lost instrument, 31 ALR4th 306.

Sufficiency of evidence of nonrevocation of lost will not shown to have been inaccessible to testator — modern cases, 70 ALR4th 323.

Ademption or revocation of specific devise or bequest by guardian, committee, conservator or trustee of mentally or physically incompetent testator, 84 ALR4th 462.

Sufficiency of evidence of nonrevocation of lost will where codicil survives, 84 ALR4th 531.

§ 2-6-118.
Revocation by divorce or annulment; effect; revival; other changes excluded.

If after executing a will the testator is divorced or his marriage annulled, the divorce or annulment revokes any disposition or appointment of property made by the will to the former spouse, any provision conferring a general or special power of appointment on the former spouse, and any nomination of the former spouse as executor, trustee, conservator or guardian, unless the will expressly provides otherwise. Property prevented from passing to a former spouse because of revocation by divorce or annulment passes as if the former spouse failed to survive the decedent, and other provisions conferring some power or office on the former spouse are interpreted as if the spouse failed to survive the decedent. If provisions are revoked solely by this section, they are revived by testator’s remarriage to the former spouse. For purposes of this section, divorce or annulment means any divorce or annulment which would exclude the spouse as a surviving spouse. A decree of separation which does not terminate the status of husband and wife is not a divorce for purposes of this section. No change of circumstances other than as described in this section revokes a will.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Sufficiency of provision for, or reference to, prospective spouse to avoid lapse or revocation of will by subsequent marriage, 38 ALR4th 117.

§ 2-6-119.
Duty of custodian to deliver will; failure to comply; order to third persons.

Every custodian of a will, within ten (10) days after receipt of information that the maker thereof is dead, shall deliver the same to the clerk of the district court having jurisdiction of the estate or to the executor named therein. A failure to comply with the provisions of this section makes the person failing responsible for all damages sustained by anyone injured thereby.

If it is brought to the attention of the court that any will is in the possession of a third person, and the court or the commissioner is satisfied that the information is correct, an order shall be issued and served upon the person having possession of the will, and if he neglects or refuses to produce it in obedience to the order he may be punished by the court for contempt.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 2, §§ 3, 7; R.S. 1899, §§ 4571, 4575; C.S. 1910, §§ 5409, 5413; C.S. 1920, §§ 6681, 6685; R.S. 1931, §§ 88-209, 88-213; C.S. 1945, §§ 6-203, 6-207; W.S. 1957, §§ 2-57, 2-61; W.S. 1977, §§

2-4-201

,

2-4-205

; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1; 2019 ch. 54, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Cross references. —

As to lost or destroyed wills, see §

2-6-207

.

As to citation to persons suspected of having in possession a lost will, etc., see §

2-7-412

.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (b), substituted "the commissioner is satisfied" for "the commissioner in vacation is satisfied."

Stated

in

In re Estate of Croft, 713 P.2d 782,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 478

(Wyo. 1986).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Relative rights to real property as between purchasers from or through decedent's heirs and devisees under will subsequently sought to be established as affected by concealment or withholding of will, 22 ALR2d 1107.

Probate where two or more testamentary documents, bearing the same date or undated, are proffered, 17 ALR3d 603.

What circumstances excuse failure to submit will for probate within time limit set by statute, 17 ALR3d 1361.

Challenge in collateral proceeding to decree admitting will to probate, on ground of fraud inducing complainant not to resist probate, 84 ALR3d 1119.